Idaho, session 2025, S1213.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public School Support Program's Division
of Central Services $5,000,000 to be expended for operating expenditures
from the Public School Income Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June
30, 2026.
SECTION 2. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $5,000,000 from the General Fund to the Public School
Income Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public School Support Program's Division of Central Services,
$5,000,000 shall be considered expended from the General Fund for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. STATEWIDE TRAINING FOR EARLY LITERACY. Of the moneys appro-
priated in Section 1 of this act, $5,000,000 shall be expended for intensive
professional development and coaching supports that leverage literacy ex-
perts who are approved by the State Department of Education and trained in
the science of reading in conformance with Section 33-1807(7), Idaho Code.
The State Department of Education shall provide all kindergarten through
grade 3 teachers this professional development on a three-year cycle, while
extending the training to elementary administrators and other support staff
as time and resources allow. Additionally, the State Department of Educa-
tion shall prioritize these professional development services to teachers
and administrators in underperforming schools as calculated in the bottom
25% based on the most recent spring Idaho Reading Indicator scores. Support
for low performing schools may include pay for success models provided under
Section 33-125B, Idaho Code, for turnaround school service providers. No
later than January 5, 2026, the State Department of Education shall report to


the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office
on the distribution, expenditure, and results of these funds. The format
and content of the report shall be determined in consultation with the State
Department of Education and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.